Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE H. CONTINUATION OF ADMINISTRATION

CHAPTER 357. RENTING ESTATE PROPERTY

SUBCHAPTER A. RENTAL AND RETURN OF ESTATE PROPERTY

Sec. 357.001. RENTING ESTATE PROPERTY WITHOUT COURT ORDER. (a) The personal representative of an estate, without a court order, may rent any of the estate property for one year or less, at public auction or privately, as is considered to be in the best interest of the estate.

(b) On the sworn complaint of any person interested in the estate, the court shall require a personal representative who, without a court order, rents estate property to account to the estate for the reasonable value of the rent of the property, to be ascertained by the court on satisfactory evidence.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 357.002. RENTING ESTATE PROPERTY WITH COURT ORDER. (a) The personal representative of an estate may, if the representative prefers, and shall, if the proposed rental period is more than one year, file a written application with the court setting forth the property the representative seeks to rent.

(b) If the court finds that granting an application filed under Subsection (a) is in the interest of the estate, the court shall grant the application and issue an order that:

(1) describes the property to be rented; and

(2) states whether the property will be rented at public auction or privately, whether for cash or on credit, and if on credit, the extent of the credit and the period for which the property may be rented.

(c) If, under Subsection (b), the court orders property to be rented at public auction, the court shall prescribe whether notice of the auction shall be published or posted.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 8.016, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 357.003. ESTATE PROPERTY RENTED ON CREDIT. Possession of estate property rented on credit may not be delivered until the renter executes and delivers to the personal representative a note with good personal security for the amount of the rent. If the property is delivered without the representative receiving the required security, the representative and the sureties on the representative's bond are liable for the full amount of the rent. When a rental is payable in installments, in advance of the period to which the installments relate, this section does not apply.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 357.004. CONDITION OF RETURNED ESTATE PROPERTY. (a) Estate property that is rented, with or without a court order, must be returned to the estate's possession in as good a condition, except for reasonable wear and tear, as when the property was rented.

(b) The personal representative of an estate shall:

(1) ensure that rented estate property is returned in the condition required by Subsection (a);

(2) report to the court any damage to, or loss or destruction of, the property; and

(3) ask the court for the authority to take any necessary action.

(c) A personal representative who fails to act as required by this section and the sureties on the representative's bond are liable to the estate for any loss or damage suffered as a result of the representative's failure.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 357.005. COMPLAINT FOR FAILURE TO RENT. (a) Any person interested in an estate may:

(1) file a written and sworn complaint in the court in which the estate is pending; and

(2) have the personal representative cited to appear and show cause why the representative did not rent any estate property.

(b) The court, on hearing the complaint, shall issue an order that appears to be in the best interest of the estate.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. REPORT ON RENTED ESTATE PROPERTY

Sec. 357.051. REPORTS CONCERNING RENTALS. (a) A personal representative of an estate who rents estate property with an appraised value of $3,000 or more shall, not later than the 30th day after the date the property is rented, file with the court a sworn and written report stating:

(1) the property rented and the property's appraised value;

(2) the date the property was rented and whether the rental occurred at public auction or privately;

(3) the name of each person renting the property;

(4) the rental amount; and

(5) whether the rental was for cash or on credit and, if on credit, the length of time, the terms, and the security received for the credit.

(b) A personal representative of an estate who rents estate property with an appraised value of less than $3,000 may report the rental in the next annual or final account that must be filed as required by law.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 357.052. COURT ACTION ON REPORT. (a) At any time after the fifth day after the date the report of renting is filed, the court shall:

(1) examine the report; and

(2) by order approve and confirm the report if found just and reasonable.

(b) If the court disapproves the report, the estate is not bound and the court may order another offering for rent of the property that is the subject of the report, in the same manner and subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(c) If the court approves the report and it later appears that, by reason of any fault of the personal representative, the property was not rented for the property's reasonable value, the court shall have the representative and the sureties on the representative's bond appear and show cause why the reasonable value of the rent of the property should not be adjudged against the representative.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.